en: Panini breads
fr: Pains panini, Pain panini

en: Bagel breads, Bagel
de: Bagels
es: Bagels, Bagel
fi: Vesirinkelit, Bagelit, Bagel
fr: Pains Bagel, Bagel, Pain bagel
hr: Bagel kruhovi
ja: ベーグル
lt: Bagel duonos
nl: Bagels, Bagel

en: Papadum, Papad
de: Papad
es: Papadams, Pappadams, Appalam
fr: Pappadums, Pappadum, Papadum
hr: Papadum
ja: パーパド
nl: Pappadums

en: Lepinja
xx: Lepinja, Lepina, Лепиња
mk: Лепиња
sr: Лепиња

en: Somun (Turkish), Turkish somun
tr: Somun

en: Somun (Balkan), Balkan somun
bs: Somun

en: Breakfasts
ca: Esmorzars
da: Morgenmad
de: Frühstücke, Frühstück
es: Desayunos
fi: aamupalat
fr: Petit-déjeuners, petits déjeuner
he: ארוחות בוקר
hr: Doručci
hu: Reggelik
it: Colazioni
ja: 朝食
lt: Pusryčiai
nl: Ontbijten, Ontbijt
pl: Produkty śniadaniowe
pt: Pequenos alomoços
ru: На завтрак
sv: Frukostmat, Frukost, Frukostar
th: อาหารเช้า
tr: Kahvaltı ürünleri
zh: 早餐

en: Cocoa and its products
bg: Какаови изделия, какаови продукти
ca: Cacau i derivats
da: Kakao og kakaoprodukter, Chokoladeprodukter
de: Kakao und Kakaoprodukte, Schokoladenprodukte
es: Cacao y sus productos
fr: Cacao et dérivés, produits chocolatés, produits au chocolat
hr: Kakao i njegovi proizvodi, csokoládé termékek
it: Cacao e i suoi derivati
lt: Kakava ir jos produktai, Šokoladiniai gaminiai
nl: Cacao en afgeleide producten, Chocoladeproducten
pl: Kakao i produkty na bazie kakao, Produkty czekoladowe
pt: Cacau e derivados, produtos com chocolate
sv: Kakao och kakaoprodukter, Kakao och produkter därav, Chokladprodukter
tr: Kakao ve kakao ürünleri
zh: 可可及其制品

en: Cocoa beans
bg: Какаови зърна
fr: Fèves de cacao
hr: Zrna kakaa
ja: カカオ豆
lt: Kakavos pupelės
nl: Cacaobonen

en: Roasted cocoa beans
bg: Печени какаови зърна
fr: Fèves de cacao torréfiées
hr: Pržena zrna kakaovca
lt: Skrudintos kakavos pupelės
nl: Geroosterde cacaobonen

en: Raw cocoa beans
bg: Сурови какаови зърна
fr: Fèves de cacao crues
hr: Sirova zrna kakaovca
lt: Neskrudintos kakavos pupelės
nl: Rauwe cacaobonen

en: Cocoa and chocolate powders, chocolate and cocoa powders
bg: Какао и шоколад на прах
ca: Pols de coco i xocolata
de: Kakao- und Schokoladenpulver, Schkoladen- und Kakaopulver
es: Cacaos y chocolates en polvo, chocolates y cacaos en polvo
fi: Kaakao- ja suklaajauheet
fr: Cacaos et chocolats en poudre, chocolats et cacaos en poudre
hr: Kakao i čokoladni prah
hu: Kakaó- és csokoládéporok
it: Cacao e cioccolato in polvere
lt: Kakavos ir šokolado milteliai, šokolado ir kakavos milteliai
nl: Cacao en cacaopoeders, cacao en cacapoeder
pt: Cacau e chocolate em pó

en: Cocoa powders, cocoa powder, Cocoa, Cacao, Cacao powders, Instant cocoa powder without sugar
bg: Какао на прах
ca: Cacau en pols, Cacau
de: Kakaopulver, Kakao
es: Cacaos en polvo, cacao en polvo, cacao
fi: kaakaojauheet
fr: Cacaos en poudre, cacao en poudre, cacao, poudres de cacao, Cacao non sucré en poudre soluble, Cacao en poudre non sucré, Poudres cacaotées
hr: Kakaov prah
it: Cacao in polvere
ja: カカオパウダー
lt: Kakavos milteliai, kakava, milteliai kakavoms, tirpūs kakavos milteliai be cukraus
nl: Cacaopoeders, Cacaopoeder, Cacao
pl: Kakao w proszku
pt: Cacau em pó
ru: Какао-порошок
th: ผงโกโก้

en: Instant cocoa or chocolate beverage with sugar(s) fortified with vitamins ready-to-drink (reconstituted with semi-skimmed milk), Instant cocoa or chocolate beverage with sugar fortified with vitamins and chemical elements ready-to-drink (reconstituted with standard semi-skimm
fr: Boisson cacaotée ou au chocolat instantanée sucrée enrichie en vitamines prête à boire (reconstituée avec du lait demi-écrémé standard)

en: Instant chocolate powders, chocolate powders, Instant chocolate drinks, Instant hot chocolates
de: Kakaohaltige Getränkepulver, Kakaogranulate, Instant-Kakaos, Kakaogetränkpulver, Kabapulver, Kabas
es: Chocolates en polvo
fi: kaakaojuomajauheet
fr: Chocolats en poudre, chocolat en poudre, poudres de chocolat, chocolats instantanés, boissons chocolatées à reconstituer, boissons cacaotées à reconstituer, boissons chocolatées en poudre, boissons cacaotées en poudre
hr: Čokoladni prahovi
it: Cioccolata in polvere
ja: ココアパウダー
lt: Šokolado milteliai, tirpūs šokoladiniai gėrimai, greitai paruošiami karšti šokoladai
nl: Oplospoeder voor chocolademelk, Oploschocoladepoeder
pt: Pós de chocolate
ro: Ciocolată caldă instant, Pudră de ciocolată

en: Cocoa powder for beverages with sugar, Chocolate powder for beverages with sugar
fr: Poudre cacaotée pour boisson sucrée, Poudre au chocolat pour boisson sucrée

en: Cocoa powder for beverages with sugar fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Chocolate powder for beverages with sugar fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Poudre cacaotée sucrée pour boisson enrichie en vitamines et minéraux, Poudre au chocolat sucrée pour boisson enrichie en vitamines et minéraux

en: Cocoa powder for beverages with sugar fortified with vitamins, Chocolate powder for beverages with sugar fortified with vitamins
fr: Poudre cacaotée pour boisson sucrée enrichie en vitamines, Poudre au chocolat pour boisson sucrée enrichie en vitamines

en: Malted cocoa, Malted cocoa with sugar fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Poudre maltée cacaotée, Poudre maltée cacaotée sucrée pour boisson enrichie en vitamines et minéraux

en: Cakes
ar: كعك
az: Tort
be: пірожнае
bg: кекс
bn: পিষ্টক
bs: Torta
ca: Pastís
ce: Мерза хьокхум
cs: buchta
cy: Teisen
da: kage
de: Kuchen
eo: kuko
es: Pasteles, pastel
et: Kook
eu: Gozopil
fa: کیک
fi: kakku
fr: gâteaux, Gâteau
ga: Císte
gl: Pastel
he: עוגה
hi: केक
hr: kolači, kolač
ht: Gato
hu: Sütemények, sütemény
hy: տորթ
id: Bolu
io: Kuko
is: Kaka
it: torta
ja: ケーキ
jv: Bolu
kn: ಕೇಕ್
ko: 케이크
ku: Kulîçe
la: Scriblita
lt: Pyragai, Pyragaičiai, Tortai
lv: kūka
mk: колач
ml: കേക്ക്
mr: केक
ms: Kek
nb: kake
ne: केक
nl: Cakes
nn: kake
oc: pastisson
pa: ਕੇਕ
pl: Ciasto, ciasta
pt: bolos, bolo
qu: Pastil
ro: Prăjitură
ru: пирожное
sh: Pita
si: කේක්
sr: торта
su: Bolu
sv: Tårta
sw: Keki
ta: அணிச்சல்
te: కేక్
th: เค้ก
tl: Kakanin
tr: Kek
uk: тістечко
ur: کیک
vi: bánh ngọt
wa: Wastea
yi: קוכן
zh: 蛋糕